Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1913
Records; transfer to successor; violation; penalty.

When the term of any county surveyor shall expire or he shall resign or be removed, he shall deliver to his successor all books, maps, plats, diagrams, and papers pertaining to his office, and all correspondence with the Department of the Interior at Washington, D.C., and state officials pertaining to surveys in his county. Any county surveyor who, on the expiration of his term of office, or on his resignation or removal, shall neglect, for the period of thirty days after his successor shall be elected or appointed, and qualified, to deliver all such books, maps, plats, diagrams, papers, and correspondence aforesaid, or any executor or administrator of any deceased county surveyor, who shall neglect for the space of thirty days to deliver to such successor all such books, maps, plats, diagrams, papers, and correspondence aforesaid, which shall come into his hands, shall forfeit and pay into the county treasury a sum not less than ten and not more than fifty dollars, and a similar sum for each thirty days thereafter during which he shall so neglect to deliver the same as aforesaid. If no successor has been elected or appointed and qualified, then they shall be delivered to the county clerk.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 11, p. 146;

R.S.1913, § 5697;

C.S.1922, § 5027;

C.S.1929, § 26-1613;

R.S.1943, § 23-1913.